Texas, session 892, HB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle B, Title 4, Government Code, is amended by adding Chapter 419A to read as follows: CHAPTER 419A.  TEXAS FLOOD RECOVERY, REIMBURSEMENT, AND RECONSTRUCTION PROGRAM SUBCHAPTER A.  GENERAL PROVISIONS Sec. 419A.001.  DEFINITIONS. In this chapter: (1)  "Division" means the Texas Division of Emergency Management. (2)  "Program" means the Texas Flood Recovery, Reimbursement, and Reconstruction Program established under Subchapter B. (3)  "Special flood hazard area" means land in a floodplain subject to at least a one percent annual chance of flooding as designated by the director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency. Sec. 419A.002.  PROGRAM REVIEW AND EXPIRATION. (a)  The Texas Flood Recovery, Reimbursement, and Reconstruction Program is subject to review by the Legislative Budget Board each odd-numbered year. The Legislative Budget Board shall submit findings and recommendations for the program to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Appropriations Committee, or their successors. (b)  Unless continued in existence by the legislature, the program and this chapter expire September 1, 2035. SUBCHAPTER B.  PROGRAM ESTABLISHMENT AND ADMINISTRATION Sec. 419A.051.  PROGRAM ESTABLISHMENT. The division shall establish the Texas Flood Recovery, Reimbursement, and Reconstruction Program to provide targeted and fiscally responsible relief to persons impacted by the July 2025 Hill Country floods through: (1)  reimbursement of real and personal property losses; and (2)  incentives for repair and reconstruction of real property above flood levels or in locations not prone to flooding to reduce future risk of loss and taxpayer burden. Sec. 419A.052.  PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION. The division shall administer the program in coordination with the General Land Office and the Federal Emergency Management Agency. Sec. 419A.053.  DIVISION POWERS AND DUTIES UNDER PROGRAM. (a)  The division shall: (1)  establish an online application system with auto-population features using Federal Emergency Management Agency claim denial information, county property tax appraisal rolls, and floodplain maps; (2)  review documentation for and conduct site inspections of property impacted by the July 2025 Hill Country floods; (3)  verify a complete or partial denial of a property insurance claim by an insurer or a flood damage claim by the Federal Emergency Management Agency not later than the 15th business day after the date the division receives an application; (4)  approve or deny completed program applications not later than the 30th calendar day after the date the division receives the application, provided the division does not encounter any extraordinary circumstances preventing compliance with that date; (5)  annually audit at least 15 percent of the program awards; (6)  approve construction plans conforming to resiliency standards described by Section 419A.105 and verify affidavits from applicants certifying compliance with those standards; (7)  require proof of a program applicant's expenditures; (8)  establish a formal appeals process for denied applications; (9)  maintain and quarterly update the dashboard required under Section 419A.054; and (10)  coordinate with county and municipal emergency management offices to assist with application intake, damage verification, and applicant outreach. (b)  The division may issue: (1)  a program award in two installments; and (2)  a second installment of a program award contingent on the award recipient providing verification of compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. Sec. 419A.054.  PROGRAM INFORMATION PUBLISHED ON INTERNET WEBSITE. The division shall develop and publish on the division's publicly available Internet website: (1)  the division's program award priorities developed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter; (2)  an application scoring system for processing and approving applications submitted under this chapter; and (3)  a dashboard listing paid program awards by county, property type, resiliency construction status, average award amount, and any audit results. Sec. 419A.055.  LIST OF QUALIFIED PROFESSIONALS. The division may develop and maintain a list of qualified contractors, engineers, and vendors for expedited review and approval of applications submitted under this chapter. SUBCHAPTER C.  AWARD FOR FLOOD DAMAGE AFFECTING REAL PROPERTY Sec. 419A.101.  ELIGIBILITY FOR AWARD. (a)  A person is eligible for a program award for a loss of or damage to real property under this subchapter only if: (1)  the person is a resident of or a legal entity domiciled in this state; (2)  the person owns real property that sustained flood damage during the July 2025 Hill Country floods; (3)  the person maintained residential or commercial insurance coverage, other than flood insurance coverage, for the real property at the time the property sustained the flood damage; (4)  an insurer or the Federal Emergency Management Agency wholly or partly denied the person's property insurance claim or flood damage claim; and (5)  the person submits an application for an award under this subchapter. (b)  An application for an award under this subchapter must include: (1)  except as otherwise provided by this section, documentation the person was not required, including by a lender for property subject to a mortgage, to maintain flood insurance coverage for the property; (2)  documentation of a complete or partial denial of the person's property insurance claim by an insurer or flood damage claim by the Federal Emergency Management Agency; and (3)  receipts or cost estimates for repair or reconstruction of the person's real property, which may include architectural designs, geotechnical analyses, cost modeling, and permit costs. (c)  An applicant who is otherwise eligible for an award under this subchapter may not be considered ineligible based on: (1)  a requirement for the person to obtain flood insurance as a result of a change in the floodplain map that occurred after July 1, 2023; and (2)  the lack of formal notice to the person from the Federal Emergency Management Agency or a mortgage lender of the requirement to obtain flood insurance as a result of the change in the floodplain map. (d)  If a person's real property is not subject to a mortgage and the person did not receive notice of the real property's floodplain designation from the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the person is presumed to have been unaware of the floodplain designation and is eligible for an award under this subchapter. Sec. 419A.102.  APPLICATION DEADLINE; EXTENSION.  (a) Except as provided by this section, a person eligible for an award under this subchapter must submit an application not later than May 1, 2026. (b)  The division may extend the application deadline described by Subsection (a) for categories of applicants if the division determines the extension is necessary because of: (1)  delays by insurers in assessing property insurance claims or by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in assessing flood damage claims; (2)  natural barriers to a person's access to the real property; or (3)  other extenuating circumstances preventing otherwise eligible persons from submitting an application on or before that date. (c)  If the division extends an application deadline under this section, the division shall post on its publicly available Internet website: (1)  the categories of eligible persons for whom the deadline is extended; (2)  the reason for the extension; and (3)  the date of the extended deadline. Sec. 419A.103.  AWARD PRIORITIES. (a)  The division shall prioritize awards under this subchapter to eligible applicants as follows: (1)  first priority to applicants whose flood damage claim for the applicant's primary place of residence or small business was denied by an insurer or the Federal Emergency Management Agency; (2)  second priority to applicants whose flood damage claim for the applicant's nonprimary residence or other family-owned property was denied by an insurer or the Federal Emergency Management Agency; and (3)  third priority to applicants whose paid flood damage claim equaled an amount less than 50 percent of the applicant's total claimed losses. (b)  For each priority category described by Subsection (a), the division shall further prioritize awards for applicants, as applicable, by: (1)  household or business income; (2)  property value according to the applicable county property tax appraisal roll; (3)  applicant age; (4)  the number of applicant dependents; and (5)  the applicant's disability status. (c)  The division shall expedite applications for applicants who are seeking an award of $35,000 or less and agree to: (1)  simplified documentation of the award; (2)  public disclosure of the award; and (3)  waiver of an audit of the award. Sec. 419A.104.  AWARD AMOUNTS; LIMITATIONS.  (a)  Subject to the limitations of this section, the division may award to eligible applicants: (1)  an amount equal to either: (A)  50 percent of the total cost for reconstructing a residential or commercial structure in the same floodplain location without additional flood mitigation measures; or (B)  100 percent of the total cost for reconstructing a residential or commercial structure at a location: (i)  other than a location in a designated floodplain; or (ii)  above the Federal Emergency Management Agency's base flood elevation, in compliance with resiliency standards described by Section 419A.105; and (2)  an amount equal to not more than 15 percent of additional costs for construction or reconstruction of shared flood-resilient infrastructure benefiting three or more residential or commercial structures, as determined by the division. (b)  An award amount under Subsection (a) may not exceed: (1)  $250,000 for a single-family primary residential structure; (2)  $500,000 for a commercial structure of a small business employing not more than 50 employees; and (3)  $750,000 for an agricultural structure, essential infrastructure, or a multifamily residential structure. (c)  Costs eligible for an award under this subchapter include: (1)  structural repairs; (2)  plumbing, HVAC, or electrical system repairs; (3)  major appliance repairs or purchases; (4)  replacement or repair of essential personal property necessary for habitation or business functions in amounts not to exceed: (A)  $25,000 for a single-family primary residential structure; or (B)  $50,000 for a commercial structure; (5)  replacement or repair of vehicles essential to residential, agricultural, or commercial operations, including tractors, watercraft, and all-terrain vehicles; and (6)  repair or construction of dams or levees located on private property and serving flooding mitigation, irrigation, or livestock water supply functions. (d)  The division shall determine the reimbursable amount for an item eligible under this section based on the actual cost to repair or replace the item. (e)  The division by rule may: (1)  distinguish the cash value of eligible items from the cost to repair the eligible items, in a manner consistent with Federal Emergency Management Agency standards and industry practices; and (2)  further limit the reimbursement amount for personal property, such as recreational vehicles, luxury watercraft, or other nonessential personal property, unless the applicant demonstrates the personal property is: (A)  essential for agricultural, business, or public utility operations; and (B)  not eligible for reimbursement from an insurer or the Federal Emergency Management Agency. Sec. 419A.105.  RESILIENCY STANDARDS. To be eligible for an award reimbursing 100 percent of costs under Section 419A.104(a)(1)(B), a person must reconstruct a structure in accordance with the following resiliency standards: (1)  finished flooring must be at least two feet above the Federal Emergency Management Agency's base flood elevation; (2)  the structure must be constructed or repaired using flood-resistant materials, as described in Federal Emergency Management Agency P-348, Protecting Building Utility Systems from Flood Damage (2nd ed. Feb. 2017); (3)  the structure must include flood mitigation measures such as flood venting, reinforced foundations, and elevated utility connections; and (4)  the reconstruction plans must be certified by a licensed engineer. SUBCHAPTER D.  AWARD FOR FLOOD DAMAGE OF PERSONAL PROPERTY IN RENTAL PROPERTY Sec. 419A.151.  ELIGIBILITY FOR AWARD. (a)  A person is eligible for an award for the loss of or damage to essential personal property under this subchapter only if: (1)  the person is a resident of this state and was a tenant of a rental property that: (A)  was located in a county included in the July 5, 2025, disaster declaration issued by the governor under Section 418.014 in response to the July 2025 Hill Country floods; and (B)  sustained flood damage during the July 2025 Hill Country floods; and (2)  the person submits an application for an award under this subchapter. (b)  An application for an award under this subchapter must include: (1)  itemized documentation of the flood damage to the personal property, including receipts, photographs, affidavits, or third-party verification of the losses; and (2)  either: (A)  for personal property insured at the time the property was damaged, documentation of: (i)  the denial of the person's property insurance claim by an insurer or flood damage claim by the Federal Emergency Management Agency; or (ii)  payment of the person's property insurance claim by an insurer or flood damage claim by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in an amount equal to less than 50 percent of the documented losses; or (B)  for personal property not insured for flood damage losses, the applicant's attestation the person had not received written notice of the rental property's location in a special flood hazard area during the applicant's tenancy. Sec. 419A.152.  APPLICATION DEADLINE; EXTENSION.  (a) Except as provided by this section, a person eligible for an award under this subchapter must submit an application not later than May 1, 2026. (b)  The division may extend the application deadline described by Subsection (a) for categories of applicants if the division determines the extension is necessary because of: (1)  delays by insurers in assessing property insurance claims or by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in assessing flood damage claims; (2)  natural barriers to a person's access to or a person's displacement from the rental property; or (3)  other extenuating circumstances preventing otherwise eligible persons from submitting an application on or before that date. (c)  If the division extends an application deadline under this section, the division shall post on its publicly available Internet website: (1)  the categories of eligible persons for whom the deadline is extended; (2)  the reason for the extension; and (3)  the date of the extended deadline. Sec. 419A.153.  AWARD LIMITATIONS. (a)  An award for personal property losses under this subchapter is limited to amounts for essential personal property, including furniture, clothing, appliances, medical devices, educational tools, and work-related equipment necessary for employment. (b)  An award for personal property losses under this subchapter may not exceed $25,000 per household unless: (1)  the applicant demonstrates the property is: (A)  essential for agricultural, business, or public utility operations; and (B)  not eligible for reimbursement from an insurer or the Federal Emergency Management Agency; and (2)  the total award amount does not exceed $50,000. (c)  Luxury goods, recreational equipment, or personal property included in a flood damage claim reimbursed by or eligible for reimbursement from an insurer, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or the National Flood Insurance Program are ineligible for an award under this subchapter. SUBCHAPTER E.  FUNDING AND FRAUD PREVENTION Sec. 419A.201.  FUNDING. The division may administer the program and fund awards provided under the program using: (1)  legislative appropriations to the division for program purposes; and (2)  gifts, grants, and donations for program purposes. Sec. 419A.202.  LIMITATIONS ON RECOVERY. The division may not issue an award under this chapter for an amount paid in a flood damage claim by an insurer, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the National Flood Insurance Program, or another private or public assistance program. Sec. 419A.203.  FRAUD PREVENTION; CIVIL PENALTY.  (a)  The division shall report a suspected instance of fraud in an award under this chapter to the attorney general. (b)  On the attorney general's determination that a person has committed fraud in applying for or accepting an award under this chapter, the attorney general may bring an action against the person to recover for the division the award, interest on the award, and a civil penalty as determined by the attorney general. (c)  The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses incurred in bringing an action under this section, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition costs. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.